California statutes. Corporations Code
(1) A restated certificate of limited partnership may be filed that embodies all of the provisions that are in effect contained in the different certificates that have been filed with the Secretary of State.

(2) A restated certificate of limited partnership may include an amendment of the certificate of limited partnership not previously filed with the Secretary of State.

(3) The restated certificate of limited partnership shall supersede the initial certificate of limited partnership and all amendments thereto previously filed with the Secretary of State.

(4) Any amendment effected in connection with the restatement of the certificate of limited partnership shall be subject to any other provision of this chapter not inconsistent with this section that would apply if a separate certificate of amendment were filed to effect that amendment.

(f) Subject to subdivision (c) of Section 15902.06, an amendment or restated certificate is effective when filed by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.03.

A dissolved limited partnership that has completed winding up shall deliver to and on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of cancellation that states:

(1) the name of the limited partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number;

(2) the date of filing of its initial certificate of limited partnership; and

(3) any other information as determined by the general partners filing the certificate or by a person appointed pursuant to subdivisions (c) or (d) of Section 15908.03.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.04.

(a) Each record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed in the following manner:

(1) An initial certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

(2) An amendment designating as general partner a person admitted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 15908.01 following the dissociation of a limited partnership’s last general partner must be signed by that person.

(3) An amendment required by subdivision (c) of Section 15908.03 following the
 appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities must be signed by that person.

(4) Any other amendment must be signed by:

(A) at least one general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership;

(B) each other person designated in the amendment as a new general partner; and

(C) each person that the amendment indicates has dissociated as a general partner, unless:

(i) the person is deceased or a guardian or general conservator has been appointed for the person and the amendment so states; or

(ii) the person has previously delivered to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate
 of dissociation.

(5) A restated certificate of limited partnership must be signed by at least one general partner listed in the certificate, and, to the extent the restated certificate effects a change under any other paragraph of this subdivision, the restated certificate must be signed in a manner that satisfies that paragraph.

(6) A certificate of cancellation must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate of limited partnership or, if the certificate of limited partnership of a dissolved limited partnership lists no general partners, by the person appointed pursuant to subdivisions (c) or (d) of Section 15908.03 to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities.

(7) Certificates of conversion must be signed as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 15911.06.

(8) Certificates of merger must be signed as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14.

(9) A certificate of correction shall be executed in the same manner in which the record being corrected was required to be executed.

(10) Any other record delivered on behalf of a limited partnership to the Secretary of State for filing must be signed by at least one general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership.

(11) A certificate of dissociation by a person pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 15906.05 stating that the person has dissociated as a general partner must be signed by that person.

(12) A certificate of withdrawal by a person pursuant to Section
 15903.06 must be signed by that person.

(13) A record delivered on behalf of a foreign limited partnership to the Secretary of State for filing must be signed by at least one general partner of the foreign limited partnership.

(14) Any other record delivered on behalf of any person to the Secretary of State for filing must be signed by that person.

(b) Any person may sign by an attorney in fact any record to be filed pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The Secretary of State shall not be required to verify that the person withdrawing or dissociating was ever actually named in an official filing as a general or limited partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 24.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.05.

(a) If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the superior court to order:

(1) the person to sign the record;

(2) deliver the record to the Secretary of State for filing; or

(3) the Secretary of State to file the record unsigned.

(b) If the person aggrieved under subdivision (a) is not the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to which the record pertains, the aggrieved person shall make the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership a party to the action. A person aggrieved under subdivision (a) may seek the remedies provided in subdivision (a) in the same action in combination or in the alternative. In any action under this subdivision, if the court finds the failure of the person to comply with the requirement to sign a record or deliver a record to the Secretary of State for filing to have been without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to reimburse the persons aggrieved under subdivision (a) bringing the action for the reasonable expenses incurred by such persons, including attorneys’ fees, in connection with the action or proceeding.

(c) A record filed unsigned pursuant to this section is effective without being signed.

(d) Any person, other than a general partner, delivering a record to the Secretary of State for filing, shall state the statutory authority for such action after the signature on the appropriate record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.06.

(a) A record authorized or required to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter must be completed on a form prescribed by and in a medium permitted by the Secretary of State, and be delivered to the Secretary of State. Unless the Secretary of State determines that a record does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, and if all requisite fees have been paid, the Secretary of State shall file the record.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 15901.16, 15902.01, and 15902.07, a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter may specify an effective time and a delayed effective date. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed by the Secretary of State is effective:

(1) if the record does not specify a delayed effective date, on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the Secretary of State’s endorsement of the date on the record;

(2) if the record specifies a delayed effective date on the earlier of:

(A) the specified date; or

(B) the 90th day after the record is filed; or

(c) In case a delayed effective date is specified, the record may be prevented from becoming effective by a certificate stating that by appropriate action it has been revoked and is null and void, executed in the same manner as the original record and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing before the specified effective date. In the case of certificate of merger, a certificate revoking the earlier filing need only be executed on behalf of one of the constituent parties to the merger. If no such revocation certificate is filed, the record becomes effective on the date specified.

(d) If the Secretary of State determines that a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing does not conform to the law and returns it to the person delivering it, the record may be resubmitted accompanied by a written opinion of the member of the State Bar of California delivering the record or representing the person delivering it, to the effect that the specific provisions of the record objected to by the Secretary of State do conform to law and stating the points and authorities upon which the opinion is based. The Secretary of State shall rely, with respect to any disputed point of law, other than the application of Sections 15901.08, 15901.09, 15909.02, and 15909.05, upon that written opinion in determining whether the record conforms to law. When filed by the Secretary of State upon resubmission, such record is effective retroactively as of the date that the original record was delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.07.

(a) A limited partnership or foreign limited partnership may deliver to and on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of correction containing the name of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number for the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to correct a record previously delivered by the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to the Secretary of State and filed by the Secretary of State, if at the time of filing the record contained false or erroneous information or was defectively signed.

(b) A certificate of correction may not state a delayed effective date and
 must:

(1) describe the record to be corrected, including its filing date and file number;

(2) specify the incorrect information and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the signing was defective; and

(3) correct the incorrect information or defective signature.

(c) When filed by the Secretary of State, a certificate of correction is effective retroactively as of the effective date of the record the certificate corrects, but the certificate is effective when filed:

(1) for the purposes of subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 15901.03; and

(2) as to persons relying on the uncorrected record and adversely affected by
 the correction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 25.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.08.

(a) If a record delivered to the Secretary of State for filing under this chapter and filed by the Secretary of State contains false information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

(1) a person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be false at the time the record was signed; and

(2) a general partner that has notice that the information was false when the record was filed or has become false because of changed circumstances, if the general partner has notice for a reasonably sufficient time before the information is relied upon to enable the general partner to effect an amendment under Section 15902.02, file a petition pursuant to Section 15902.05, or deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of correction pursuant to Section 15902.07.

(b) Signing a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts stated in the record are true.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15902.09.

(a) A domestic limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership has been canceled pursuant to Section 15902.03 may be revived by filing with, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State a certificate of revival. The certificate of revival shall be accompanied by written confirmation by the Franchise Tax Board that all of the following have occurred:

(1) All of the following have been paid to the Franchise Tax Board:

(A) The annual tax due under Section 17935 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) All fees, penalties, and interest for each
 year for which the domestic limited partnership failed to pay such annual tax,
 including each year between the cancellation of its certificate of limited partnership and its revival.

(2) All required tax returns have been filed, including returns for each taxable year between the cancellation of its certificate of limited partnership and its revival.

(b) The certificate of revival shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the limited partnership at the time its certificate of limited partnership was canceled, and if the name is not available at the time of revival, the name under which the limited partnership is to be revived.

(2) The date of filing of the original certificate of limited partnership.

(3) The address of the limited partnership’s principal office.

(4) The name and address of the initial agent for service of process in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 15901.16.

(5) A statement that the certificate of revival is filed by one or more general partners of the limited partnership authorized to execute and file the certificate of revival to revive the limited partnership.

(6) The Secretary of State’s file number for the original limited partnership.

(7) The name and address of each general partner.

(8) Any other matters the general partner or partners executing the certificate of revival determine to include therein.

(c) The certificate of revival should be deemed to be an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership, and the limited partnership shall not be required to take any further action to amend its certificate of limited partnership pursuant to Section 15902.02 with respect to the matter set forth in the certificate of revival.

(d) Upon the filing of the certificate of revival, the limited partnership shall be revived with the same force and effect as if the certificate of limited partnership had not been canceled pursuant to Section 15902.03. The revival shall validate all contracts, acts, matters, and things made, done, and performed by the limited partnership,
 its partners, employees, and agents following the time its certificate of limited partnership was canceled pursuant to Section 15902.03 with the same force and effect and all intents and purposes as if the certificate of limited partnership had remained in full force and effect. This provision shall apply provided that third parties are relying on the acts of the partnership, its partners, employees, and agents. All real and personal property, and all rights and interests, that belong to a limited partnership at the time its certificate of limited partnership was canceled pursuant to Section 15902.03 or that were acquired by the limited partnership following the cancellation of the certificate of limited partnership, that were not disposed of before the time of its revival, shall be vested in the limited partnership after its revival as fully as if they were held by the limited partnership at, and
 during the time after, as the case may be, the time the certificate of limited partnership was canceled. After its revival, the limited partnership and its partners shall have all of the same liability for contracts, acts, matters, and things made, done, or performed in the limited partnership’s name and on behalf of its partners, employees, and agents, as the limited partnership and its partners would have had if the limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership had at all times remained in full force and effect.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to written confirmations made by the Franchise Tax Board on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 90.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Limited Partners [15903.01. - 15903.07.]

15903.01.

A person becomes a limited partner:

(a) as provided in the partnership agreement;

(b) as the result of a conversion or merger under Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01); or

(c) with the consent of all the partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.02.

A limited partner does not have the right or the power as a limited partner to act for or bind the limited partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.03.

(a) A limited partner is not liable for any obligation of a limited partnership unless named as a general partner in the certificate or, in addition to exercising the rights and powers of a limited partner, the limited partner participates in the control of the business. If a limited partner participates in the control of the business without being named as a general partner, that partner may be held liable as a general partner only to persons who transact business with the limited partnership with actual knowledge of that partner’s participation in control and with a reasonable belief, based upon the limited partner’s conduct, that the partner is a general partner at the time of the transaction. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the liability of a limited partner to third parties for the limited partner’s participation in tortious conduct.

(b) A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subdivision (a) solely by doing, attempting to do, or having the right or power to do, one or more of the following:

(1) Being any of the following:

(A) An independent contractor for, an agent or employee of, or transacting business with, the limited partnership or a general partner of the limited partnership.

(B) An officer, director, or shareholder of a corporate general partner of the limited partnership.

(C) A member, manager, or officer of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the limited partnership.

(D) A limited partner of a partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership.

(E) A trustee, administrator, executor, custodian, or other fiduciary or beneficiary of an estate or trust that is a general partner.

(F) A trustee, officer, adviser, shareholder, or beneficiary of a business trust that is a general partner.

(2) Consulting with and advising a general partner with respect to the business of the limited partnership.

(3) Acting as surety for the limited partnership or for a general partner, guaranteeing one or more specific debts of the limited partnership, providing collateral for the limited partnership or general partner, borrowing money from the limited partnership or a general partner, or lending money to the limited partnership or a general partner.

(4) Approving or disapproving an amendment to the partnership agreement.

(5) Voting on, proposing, or calling a meeting of the partners.

(6) Winding up the partnership pursuant to Section 15908.03.

(7) Executing and filing a certificate pursuant to Section 15902.05, a certificate of withdrawal pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 15902.04, or a certificate of cancellation of the certificate of limited partnership pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 15902.04.

(8) Serving on an audit committee or committee performing the functions of an audit committee.

(9) Serving on a committee of the limited partnership or the limited partners for the purpose of approving actions of the general partner.

(10) Calling, requesting, attending, or participating at any meeting of the partners or the limited partners.

(11) Taking any action required or permitted by law to bring, pursue, settle, or terminate a derivative action on behalf of the limited partnership.

(12) Serving on the board of directors or a committee of, consulting with or advising, being or acting as an officer, director, stockholder, partner, member, manager, agent, or employee of, or being or acting as a fiduciary for, any person in which the limited partnership has an interest.

(13) Exercising any right or power permitted to limited partners under this chapter and not specifically enumerated in this subdivision.

(c) The enumeration in subdivision (b) does not mean that any other conduct or the possession or exercise of any other power by a limited partner constitutes participation by the limited partner in the control of the business of the limited partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.04.

(a) On 10 days’ demand, made in a record received by the limited partnership, a limited partner may inspect and copy any information required to be maintained pursuant to Section 15901.11 during regular business hours in the limited partnership’s principal office. The limited partner need not have any particular purpose for seeking the information.

(b) Subject to subdivision (g), during regular business hours and at a reasonable location specified by the limited partnership, a limited partner may obtain from the limited partnership, which may be transmitted via electronic transmission, and inspect and copy true and full information regarding the
 state of the activities and financial condition of the limited partnership and other information regarding the activities of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable if:

(1) the limited partner seeks the information for a purpose reasonably related to the partner’s interest as a limited partner;

(2) the limited partner makes a demand in a record received by the limited partnership, describing with reasonable particularity the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information; and

(3) the information sought is directly connected to the limited partner’s purpose.

(c) Within 10 days after receiving a demand pursuant to subdivision
 (b), the limited partnership in a record shall inform the limited partner that made the demand:

(1) what information the limited partnership will provide in response to the demand;

(2) when and where the limited partnership will provide the information; and

(3) if the limited partnership declines to provide any demanded information, the limited partnership’s reasons for declining.

(d) Subject to subdivision (f), a person dissociated as a limited partner may inspect and copy required information during regular business hours in the limited partnership’s principal office if:

(1) the information pertains
 to the period during which the person was a limited partner;

(2) the person seeks the information in good faith; and

(3) the person meets the requirements of subdivision (b).

(e) The limited partnership shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subdivision (d) in the same manner as provided in subdivision (c).

(f) If a limited partner dies, Section 15907.04 applies.

(g) The limited partnership shall have the right to keep confidential from limited partners for such period of time as the limited partnership deems reasonable, any information which the limited partnership reasonably believes to be in the
 nature of trade secrets or other information the disclosure of which the limited partnership in good faith believes is not in the best interest of the limited partnership or could damage the limited partnership or its business or which the limited partnership is required by law or by agreement with a third party to keep confidential.

(h) The limited partnership may impose reasonable restrictions on the use of information obtained under this section. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subdivision, the limited partnership has the burden of proving reasonableness.

(i) A limited partnership may charge a person that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

(j) Whenever this chapter or a partnership agreement provides for a limited partner to give or withhold consent to a matter, before the consent is given or withheld, the limited partnership shall, without demand, provide the limited partner with all information material to the limited partner’s decision that the limited partnership knows.

(k) A limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner may exercise the rights under this section through an attorney or other agent. Any restriction imposed under subdivision (g), subdivision (h) or by the partnership agreement applies both to the attorney or other agent and to the limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner.

(l) The rights stated in this
 section do not extend to a person as transferee, but may be exercised by the legal representative of an individual under legal disability who is a limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 91.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.05.

(a) A limited partner does not have any fiduciary duty to the limited partnership or to any other partner solely by reason of being a limited partner.

(b) A limited partner shall discharge the duties to the partnership and the other partners under this chapter or under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

(c) A limited partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement merely because the limited partner’s conduct furthers the limited partner’s own interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.06.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a person that makes an investment in a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not liable for the enterprise’s obligations by reason of making the investment, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of or appropriate to a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, the person:

(1) causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or certificate of correction to be signed and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; or

(2) withdraws from future participation as an owner in the enterprise by signing and delivering to and on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of withdrawal containing the name of the limited partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number of the limited partnership under this section.

(b) A person that makes an investment described in subdivision (a) is liable to the same extent as a general partner to any third party that enters into a transaction with the enterprise, believing in good faith that the person is a general partner, before the Secretary of State files a certificate of withdrawal, certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or certificate of correction to show that the person is not a general partner.

(c) If a person makes a diligent effort in good faith to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and is unable
 to cause the appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or certificate of correction to be signed and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing, the person has the right to withdraw from the enterprise pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) even if the withdrawal would otherwise breach an agreement with others that are or have agreed to become co-owners of the enterprise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 26.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15903.07.

(a) The partnership agreement may provide for the creation of classes of limited partners. The partnership agreement shall define the rights, powers, and duties of those classes, including rights, powers, and duties senior to other classes of limited partners.

(b) The partnership agreement may provide to all or certain specified classes of limited partners the right to vote separately or with all or any class or the general partners on any matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Partners [15904.01. - 15904.09.]

15904.01.

A person becomes a general partner:

(a) as provided in the partnership agreement:

(b) under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 15908.01 following the dissociation of a limited partnership’s last general partner;

(c) as the result of a conversion or merger under Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01); or

(d) with the consent of all the partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.02.

(a) Each general partner is an agent of the limited partnership for the purposes of its activities. An act of a general partner, including the signing of a record in the partnership’s name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the limited partnership’s activities or activities of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership, unless the general partner did not have authority to act for the limited partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the general partner was dealing knew, had received a notification, or had notice under subdivision (d) of Section 15901.03 that the general partner lacked authority.

(b) An act of a general partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the limited partnership’s activities or activities of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all the other partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.03.

(a) A limited partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a general partner acting in the ordinary course of activities of the limited partnership or with authority of the limited partnership.

(b) If, in the course of the limited partnership’s activities or while acting with authority of the limited partnership, a general partner receives or causes the limited partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a general partner, the limited partnership is liable for the loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.04.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), all general partners are liable jointly and severally for all obligations of the limited partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

(b) A person that becomes a general partner of an existing limited partnership is not personally liable for an obligation of a limited partnership incurred before the person became a general partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.05.

(a) To the extent not inconsistent with Section 15904.04, a general partner may be joined in an action against the limited partnership or named in a separate action.

(b) A judgment against a limited partnership is not by itself a judgment against a general partner. A judgment against a limited partnership may not be satisfied from a general partner’s assets unless there is also a judgment against the general partner.

(c) A judgment creditor of a general partner may not levy execution against the assets of the general partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the limited partnership, unless the partner is personally liable for the claim under Section 15904.04 and:

(1) a judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the limited partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

(2) the limited partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy;

(3) the general partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust limited partnership assets;

(4) a court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a general partner based on a finding that limited partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of limited partnership assets is excessively burdensome, or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court’s equitable powers; or

(5) liability is imposed on the general partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the limited partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.06.

(a) Each general partner has equal rights in the management and conduct of the limited partnership’s activities. Except as expressly provided in this chapter, any matter relating to the activities of the limited partnership may be exclusively decided by the general partner or, if there is more than one general partner, by a majority of the general partners.

(b) The consent of each partner is necessary to:

(1) amend the partnership agreement; and

(2) sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the limited partnership’s property, with or without the good will, other than in the usual and regular course of the limited partnership’s activities.

(c) A limited partnership shall reimburse a general partner for payments made and indemnify a general partner for liabilities incurred by the general partner in the ordinary course of the activities of the partnership or for the preservation of its activities or property.

(d) A limited partnership shall reimburse a general partner for an advance to the limited partnership beyond the amount of capital the general partner agreed to contribute.

(e) A payment or advance made by a general partner which gives rise to an obligation of the limited partnership under subdivision (c) or (d) constitutes a loan to the limited partnership which accrues interest from the date of the payment or advance.

(f) A general partner is not entitled to remuneration for services performed for the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.07.

(a) A general partner, without having any particular purpose for seeking the information, may inspect and copy during regular business hours:

(1) in the limited partnership’s principal office, required information; and

(2) at a reasonable location specified by the limited partnership, any other records maintained by the limited partnership regarding the limited partnership’s activities and financial condition.

(b) Each general partner and the limited partnership shall furnish to a general partner which may be transmitted via
 electronic transmission:

(1) without demand, any information concerning the limited partnership’s activities and activities reasonably required for the proper exercise of the general partner’s rights and duties under the partnership agreement or this chapter; and

(2) on demand, any other information concerning the limited partnership’s activities, except to the extent the demand or the information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

(c) Subject to subdivision (e), on 10 days’ demand made in a record received by the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general partner may have access to the information and records described in subdivision (a) at the location specified in
 subdivision (a) if:

(1) the information or record pertains to the period during which the person was a general partner;

(2) the person seeks the information or record in good faith; and

(3) the person satisfies the requirements imposed on a limited partner by subdivision (b) of Section 15903.04.

(d) The limited partnership shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subdivision (c) in the same manner as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 15903.04.

(e) If a general partner dies, Section 15907.04 applies.

(f) The limited partnership may
 impose reasonable restrictions on the use of information under this section. In any dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subdivision, the limited partnership has the burden of proving reasonableness.

(g) A limited partnership may charge a person dissociated as a general partner that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

(h) A general partner or person dissociated as a general partner may exercise the rights under this section through an attorney or other agent. Any restriction imposed under subdivision (f) or by the partnership agreement applies both to the attorney or other agent and to the general partner or person dissociated as a general partner.

(i) The rights under this section do not extend to a person as transferee, but the rights under subdivision (c) of a person dissociated as a general partner may be exercised by the legal representative of an individual who dissociated as a general partner under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 15906.03.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 92.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.08.

(a) The fiduciary duties that a general partner owes to the limited partnership and the other partners are the duties of loyalty and care under subdivisions (b) and (c).
